Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1914
Inspector General's report of investigation; contents; distribution.

(1) The Inspector General's report of an investigation shall be in writing and may contain recommendations for systemic reform. A report of an investigation shall be presented to the Director of Legislative Oversight and the chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee. The Inspector General shall present the report of an investigation to the director within three business days after the report is presented to the Director of Legislative Oversight and the chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee.

(2) Any person receiving a report under this section shall not further distribute the report or any confidential information contained in the report. The report shall not be distributed beyond the parties except through the appropriate court procedures to the judge.

(3) A report that identifies misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance, violation of statute, or violation of rules and regulations by an employee of the department or a private agency that is relevant to providing appropriate supervision of an employee may be shared with the employer of such employee. The employer shall not further distribute the report or any confidential information contained in the report.

Laws 2015, LB598, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 47-914;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 58.